Hawaii statutes.
§1-19 "Person",
"others", "any", etc. The word "person", or
words importing persons, for instance, "another", "others",
"any", "anyone", "anybody", and the like, signify
not only individuals, but corporations, firms, associations, societies,
communities, assemblies, inhabitants of a district, or neighborhood, or persons
known or unknown, and the public generally, where it appears, from the subject
matter, the sense and connection in which such words are used, that such
construction is intended. [CC 1859, §17; RL 1925, §16; RL 1935, §17; am L 1939,
c 150, §1; RL 1945, §16; am L 1945, c 233, §3; am L 1955, c 57, §1(e); RL 1955,
§1-24; HRS §1-19]

Case Notes

Though "person" includes corporation, term
"corporation" held not to include an individual. 22 H. 660, 662.

Applicability of various statutes to counties discussed,
counties as "corporations". 17 H. 9, 14. Municipal corporation
subject to garnishment as a "person". 23 H. 564, 568.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next